lib/dict/cs_CZ.aff
SFX K Y 84
SFX K   0           te         [eì]
SFX K   0           ti         [eì]
SFX K   0           tem        [eì]
SFX K   e           ata        e
SFX K   e           at         e
SFX K   e           atùm       e
SFX K   e           atech      e
SFX K   e           aty        e
SFX K   ì           ata        [^dnt]ì
SFX K   ì           at         [^dnt]ì
SFX K   ì           atùm       [^dnt]ì
SFX K   ì           atech      [^dnt]ì
SFX K   ì           aty        [^dnt]ì
SFX K   nì          òata       nì
SFX K   nì          òat        nì
SFX K   nì          òatùm      nì
SFX K   nì          òatech     nì
SFX K   nì          òaty       nì
SFX K   tì          »ata       tì
SFX K   tì          »at        tì
SFX K   tì          »atùm      tì
SFX K   tì          »atech     tì
SFX K   tì          »aty       tì
SFX K   dì          ïata       dì
SFX K   dì          ïat        dì
SFX K   dì          ïatùm      dì
SFX K   dì          ïatech     dì
SFX K   dì          ïaty       dì
SFX K   0           tu         a
SFX K   0           tem        a
SFX K   0           ta         a
SFX K   0           t          a
SFX K   0           tùm        a
SFX K   0           tech       a
SFX K   0           ty         a
SFX K   0           i          [^aeìíýïò»s]
SFX K   0           í          [^aeìíýïò»s]
SFX K   0           em         [^aeìíýïò»smc¹p]
SFX K   0           ech        [^aeìíýïò»smc¹p]
SFX K   0           mi         [^aeìíýïò»smc]
SFX K   0           ích        [p¹]
SFX K   0           ím         [p¹]
SFX K   0           ích        oc
SFX K   0           ím         oc
SFX K   0           ech        moc
SFX K   0           em         moc
SFX K   0           ech        [^o]c
SFX K   0           em         [^o]c
SFX K   0           mi         ìc
SFX K   0           emi        [^ì]c
SFX K   ï           di         ï
SFX K   ï           dí         ï
SFX K   ï           dím        ï
SFX K   ï           dích       ï
SFX K   ï           dìmi       [^eìu]ï
SFX K   0           mi         [eìu]ï
SFX K   »           ti         »
SFX K   »           tí         »
SFX K   »           tím        »
SFX K   »           tích       »
SFX K   »           tìmi       [^ì]»
SFX K   0           mi         ì»
SFX K   es          si         es
SFX K   es          sí         es
SFX K   es          sím        es
SFX K   es          sích       es
SFX K   es          semi       es
SFX K   0           i          [^e]s
SFX K   0           í          [^e]s
SFX K   0           ím         [^e]s
SFX K   0           ích        [^e]s
SFX K   0           mi         [^e]s
SFX K   ý           ost        ý
SFX K   ý           osti       ý
SFX K   ý           ostí       ý
SFX K   ý           ostem      ý
SFX K   ý           ostech     ý
SFX K   ý           ostmi      ý
SFX K   í           ost        í
SFX K   í           osti       í
SFX K   í           ostí       í
SFX K   í           ostem      í
SFX K   í           ostech     í
SFX K   í           ostmi      í

SFX Y Y 145
SFX Y   ý           á          ý
SFX Y   ý           é          ý
SFX Y   ý           ého        ý
SFX Y   ý           ému        ý
SFX Y   ý           ém         ý
SFX Y   0           m          ý
SFX Y   ý           ou         ý
SFX Y   á           é          á
SFX Y   á           ou         á
SFX Y   á           ých        á
SFX Y   á           ým         á
SFX Y   á           ými        á
SFX Y   0           ho         é
SFX Y   0           mu         é
SFX Y   0           m          é
SFX Y   é           ým         é
SFX Y   é           á          é
SFX Y   é           ých        é
SFX Y   é           ými        é
SFX Y   ý           í          [^rhk]ý
SFX Y   rý          øí         rý
SFX Y   hý          zí         [^c]hý
SFX Y   chý         ¹í         chý
SFX Y   ký          cí         [^scè]ký
SFX Y   ský         ¹tí        ský
SFX Y   cký         ètí        cký
SFX Y   ký          cí         èký
SFX Y   0           ch         ý
SFX Y   0           mi         ý
SFX Y   0           ma         ý
SFX Y   0           ho         í
SFX Y   0           mu         í
SFX Y   0           m          í
SFX Y   0           ch         í
SFX Y   0           mi         í
SFX Y   0           ma         í
SFX Y   oj          ého        [io]j
SFX Y   oj          ému        [io]j
SFX Y   oj          ý          [io]j
SFX Y   oj          ém         [io]j
SFX Y   oj          ým         [io]j
SFX Y   skoj        ¹tí        sk[io]j
SFX Y   ckoj        ètí        ck[io]j
SFX Y   koj         cí         [^sc]k[io]j
SFX Y   oj          í          [^k][io]j
SFX Y   oj          ých        [io]j
SFX Y   oj          é          [io]j
SFX Y   oj          ými        [io]j
SFX Y   0           ho         [iy]
SFX Y   0           mu         [iy]
SFX Y   0           m          [iy]
SFX Y   0           ové        [iy]
SFX Y   0           ch         [iy]
SFX Y   0           ù          [iy]
SFX Y   0           ùm         [iy]
SFX Y   0           e          [iy]
SFX Y   0           ích        [iy]
SFX Y   0           mi         [iy]
SFX Y   0           i          [iy]
SFX Y   0           ho         e
SFX Y   0           mu         e
SFX Y   0           m          e
SFX Y   e           ové        e
SFX Y   e           ù          e
SFX Y   e           ùm         e
SFX Y   e           y          e
SFX Y   0           ch         e
SFX Y   0           ho         ì
SFX Y   0           mu         ì
SFX Y   0           m          ì
SFX Y   nì          òové       nì
SFX Y   nì          òù         nì
SFX Y   nì          òùm        nì
SFX Y   ì           i          ì
SFX Y   ì           ích        ì
SFX Y   ùv          ova        ùv
SFX Y   ùv          ovu        ùv
SFX Y   ùv          ovì        ùv
SFX Y   ùv          ovým       ùv
SFX Y   ùv          ovi        ùv
SFX Y   ùv          ovy        ùv
SFX Y   ùv          ovo        ùv
SFX Y   ùv          ovou       ùv
SFX Y   ùv          ových      ùv
SFX Y   ùv          ovými      ùv
SFX Y   ùv          ovýma      ùv
SFX Y   0           a          in
SFX Y   0           u          in
SFX Y   0           ì          in
SFX Y   0           ým         in
SFX Y   0           i          in
SFX Y   0           y          in
SFX Y   0           ou         in
SFX Y   0           ých        in
SFX Y   0           ými        in
SFX Y   0           o          in
SFX Y   0           ýma        in
SFX Y   en          oho        en
SFX Y   en          omu        en
SFX Y   en          om         en
SFX Y   en          ím         en
SFX Y   en          a          en
SFX Y   en          é          en
SFX Y   en          u          en
SFX Y   en          ou         en
SFX Y   en          o          en
SFX Y   en          i          en
SFX Y   en          y          en
SFX Y   en          ìch        en
SFX Y   en          ìm         en
SFX Y   en          ìmi        en
SFX Y   en          ìma        en
SFX Y   do          oho        do
SFX Y   do          omu        do
SFX Y   do          om         do
SFX Y   do          ým         do
SFX Y   co          èeho       co
SFX Y   co          èemu       co
SFX Y   co          èem        co
SFX Y   co          èím        co
SFX Y   á¹          a¹eho      á¹
SFX Y   á¹          a¹emu      á¹
SFX Y   á¹          a¹em       á¹
SFX Y   á¹          a¹ím       á¹
SFX Y   á¹          a¹e        á¹
SFX Y   á¹          a¹í        á¹
SFX Y   á¹          a¹i        á¹
SFX Y   á¹          a¹ich      á¹
SFX Y   á¹          a¹im       á¹
SFX Y   á¹          a¹imi      á¹
SFX Y   á¹          a¹ima      á¹
SFX Y   ùj          ého        ùj
SFX Y   ùj          ému        ùj
SFX Y   ùj          ém         ùj
SFX Y   ùj          ým         ùj
SFX Y   ùj          á          ùj
SFX Y   ùj          oje        ùj
SFX Y   ùj          é          ùj
SFX Y   ùj          ojí        ùj
SFX Y   ùj          ou         ùj
SFX Y   ùj          oji        ùj
SFX Y   ùj          í          ùj
SFX Y   ùj          ých        ùj
SFX Y   ùj          ými        ùj
SFX Y   ùj          ýma        ùj
