lib/dict/cs_CZ.dic
albionský/YRN
ambiciózní/YKRN
antiepileptický/YCR
asertivní/YKRN
assemblerský/YRN
Balaąův/Y
baryonový/YKRN
běhaný/YKRN
bezchybný/YKR
bezodpadní/YR
beztvarý/YKR
blafující/YN
bloudivý/YKR
bortící/YN
brusivý/YKRN
brzděný/YKRN
cedulový/YR
ceněný/YKRN
ctiľádostivý/YKRN
časný/YKRN
červenobělejąí/YRW
čtyrnásobný/YKR
čtyřmiliónový/YR
degustační/YKRN
Dejlová/Y
detailní/YKRN
devadesátilitrový/YR
divný/YKR
dixielandový/Y
dočepovaný/YKRN
dohřímaný/YKRN
dohýřený/YKRN
dokuchávaný/YKRN
domuchlaný/YKRN
Donaufová/Y
doprogramovávaný/YKRN
dospaný/YKRN
dostudovávavaný/YRN
dotisknutý/YKRN
dozorovaný/YKRN
dramaturgynin/Y
dusávaný/YKRN
důslednějąí/YRW
dvouatomový/YKR
dvousetkilometrový/YK
ekvipotentní/YKR
endokrinologický/YRN
extenzifikační/YKRN
externistův/Y
filoloľčin/Y
formativní/YKR
Frey/Y
globalistický/YCR
godesbergský/YKRN
Halamíčkův/Y
Heligarová/Y
heterozygotnost/K
hnací/YN
horentní/YKR
hořcokvětý/YR
hřejivý/YKRN
hudbymilovný/YKR
charakteristický/YCRN
chovný/YKRN
churavý/YKRN
indiskrétní/YKRN
instalatérský/YKRN
ionský/YKRN
Jancurová/Y
jednomuľný/YKRN
jedovatý/YKRN
jitřený/YKRN
Jourová/Y
kandidátní/YKRN
kasární/YKRN
kaviárový/YR
klínopisný/YR
klovávaný/YKRN
koledovaný/YKRN
kompenzovatelný/YKRN
kongruentní/YRN
konturový/YKR
korzárův/Y
koľeluľský/YKRN
krajnějąí/YRE
kryomagnetičtějąí/YRW
křepčený/YKRN
kunětický/Y
kverulovaný/YKRN
ladný/YKRN
legovaný/YKRN
lemurův/Y
linkovanějąí/YRW
lipidový/YKR
Luďkův/Y
madeirizovaný/YKRN
maliníkový/YKRN
Maąková/Y
mazavý/YKRN
mesiáąský/YRN
mikroskopovaný/YKRN
mimetický/YRN
mnohorozměrný/YKR
močový/YR
mrákovský/Y
mrazový/YKR
naběhaný/YKRN
nabonzovaný/YKRN
nadepsaný/YKRN
nafukovaný/YKRN
nahněvanějąí/YRW
nakouskovaný/YKRN
námezdný/YKR
naoctovaný/YKRN
napověděný/YKRN
nasluhovaný/YKRN
nastrčený/YKRN
naą»ouchaný/YKRN
navymýąlený/YKRN
nedělní/YKRN
nerománský/YKR
Nevosadův/Y
nudný/YKR
Nýdrův/Y
obkládaný/YKRN
obojí/YRN
obrodný/YKRN
oceněníhodný/YKRN
odbouchnutý/YKRN
oddiskutovávaný/YKRN
odjímatelný/YKRN
odlákaný/YKRN
odlučitelný/YKRN
odplynovaný/YKRN
odskládaný/YKRN
odskládávaný/YKRN
odtočený/YKRN
ofoukaný/YKRN
ohniskovitý/YKRN
okouřený/YKRN
omlľený/YKRN
oočkovávaný/YKRN
opravovovaný/YKRN
orebský/Y
osmičlenný/YKR
ostrovní/YRN
oąvindlovaný/YKRN
ozdobný/YKRN
ozdravující/YN
páprdův/Y
Pavelův/Y
perfidní/YKR
pětasedmdesátníkův/Y
pitvající/YN
Plzeňančin/Y
pobarvený/YKRN
podmetávaný/YKRN
podraľený/YKRN
pohybující/YN
pokouąený/YKRN
polootáčecí/YN
pootevíraný/YKRN
popradský/Y
postupující/YN
posuzovatelný/YKRN
povyraľený/YKRN
pozůstalý/YKRN
prefabrikátový/YR
produkovávaný/YKRN
prohrabávaný/YKRN
proměňovaný/YKRN
propichovací/Y
prostřiľený/YKRN
protiburľoaznějąí/YRW
provztekaný/YKRN
pr»avějąí/YRW
předjímatelný/YKRN
předkonfigurovávaný/YKRN
přehryzaný/YKRN
přeinstalovaný/YKRN
přepichovaný/YKRN
přeplacenějąí/YRW
přetaľený/YKRN
přeuspořádaný/YKRN
přichytnutý/YKRN
přikreslovávaný/YKRN
přislazovaný/YKRN
příąovický/Y
pulsující/YN
pykaný/YKRN
rasantnějąí/YRW
renovační/YKRN
rezignovaný/YKRN
ropný/YR
rozestýlaný/YKRN
rozevlátý/YKRN
rozmazlovávaný/YKRN
rozmnoľitelnějąí/YRW
rozstříknutý/YKRN
roztancovávaný/YKRN
různověký/YKR
ruzyňský/YR
Sádlová/Y
sdruľený/YKRN
sebíhávaný/YKRN
semifinálový/YRN
seznamovaný/YKRN
shlíľející/YN
skladatelský/YR
sladěný/YKRN
sliněný/YKRN
snímaný/YKRN
soběpodobný/YKR
spárovaný/YKRN
spolykaný/YKRN
spřaľenějąí/YRW
steroidní/YR
stranný/YKRN
stručnějąí/YRW
supermoderní/YKR
svérázný/YKR
symbolistův/Y
ąkvrně/K
ąlechtitelův/Y
teatrálnějąí/YRW
teplokrevný/YKRN
transkontinentální/YRN
trouąený/YKRN
Tvrdíková/Y
účtovaný/YKRN
ultrajemnozrnný/YKRN
unáąivějąí/YRW
usekávaný/YKRN
uveřejněný/YKRN
uvěřený/YKRN
velmikrátkovlnný/YKRN
ventilový/Y
vláčný/YKR
vnitřní/YKRN
vsouvaný/YKRN
vybíhávaný/YKRN
vydařený/YKRN
vyjmenovaný/YKRN
vylamovaný/YKRN
vymlouvaný/YKRN
výročný/YKRN
vystrkanějąí/YRW
vyąkrabávaný/YKRN
vyzdobený/YKRN
Weberův/Y
zabubnovaný/YKRN
zakalkulovávaný/YKRN
zakutálený/YKRN
zamlľovaný/YKRN
zařáděný/YKRN
zásuvný/YKRN
zatopený/YKRN
zcivilněný/YKRN
zdýmací/Y
zhospodárněný/YKRN
zlehčený/YKRN
zmocňovací/YKRN
znovuoľivovaný/YKRN
zrohovatěný/YKRN
Zuzanin/Y
zľenątilý/YKRN
